Maryland, session 2026, SB0425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1007.
(c) (1) The State Archivist may establish BY REGULATION reasonable fees for
the care and preservation of records and other services provided by the Archives.
(2) Fees may be in the form of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0425*

SENATE BILL 425
(i) a percentage not to exceed 2% of an existing fee charged at the
time of the creation of a record in any form or format; or
(ii) a flat rate subscription charge for a publication of the Archives.
(3) Of the fees collected, 7% shall be deposited in the Archives Endowment
Account of the State Archives Fund established under § 9–1013 of this subtitle as an
educational and entrepreneurial reserve.
9–1009.
(a) The Archives may:
(1) repair and preserve the records under the supervision of the State
Archivist, as provided in the State budget;
(2) make a copy of any record in the Archives; and
(3) certify the copy.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Archives
may [charge] ESTABLISH BY REGULATION a reasonable fee for providing a copy of a
record and for certifying the record.
(2) If, with the written approval of a judge of a circuit court, the clerk of
court asks for a copy of a land record that a court has transferred to the Commission or
Archives, the Archives shall provide, without charge, a micrographic copy of the land
record.
9–1011.
(a) The Archives is the central depository for and custodian of each deed, title
insurance policy, and other record that relates to real property acquired by the State.
(c) (1) The Archives shall receive, index, and file durable–backed, microfilm
aperture card copies or electronic images of plats showing property or rights–of–way
acquired or conveyed by the State Roads Commission and the State Highway
Administration.
(2) (i) The Archives electronically shall post an image of each plat on
the Archives website (http://www.plats.net) for the county where the property or
right–of–way is located.
(ii) The posted image shall conform to a generally accepted archival
standard in quality and permanence.

SENATE BILL 425 3
(iii) The image shall include or be linked to a certification by the State
Archivist that the image is an authentic representation of the plat received by the Archives.
(iv) Such certification by the State Archivist shall constitute a
recordation of the plat.
(v) The Archives may [charge] ESTABLISH BY REGULATION a
reasonable fee to the State Roads Commission, the State Highway Administration, and the
courts to recover the cost of electronically posting and maintaining the images of plats.
(vi) The Archives may [charge] ESTABLISH BY REGULATION a
reasonable fee, not to exceed $3, to the public for the cost of reproducing a copy of a plat
under this subsection.
9–1015.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Vital record” means a record of birth, death, marriage, absolute
divorce, or marriage annulment required by law to be filed with the Department.
(e) The Archives may [charge] ESTABLISH BY REGULATION a reasonable fee to
cover the expense of copying vital records or indexes to a vital record, to make extracts from
restricted vital records or to undertake a search for vital records.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.